Maryland, session 2026, HB1245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
9.5–909.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “FIRST RESPONDER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–301 OF
THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE.
(3) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE BALTIMORE FIRST RESPONDERS CHILD
CARE SUPPORT AND ACCESSIBILITY PROGRAM.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1245*

HOUSE BILL 1245
(B) (1) THERE IS A BALTIMORE FIRST RESPONDERS CHILD CARE
SUPPORT AND ACCESSIBILITY PROGRAM.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO SUPPORT AND EXPAND A
PILOT PROGRAM IN BALTIMORE CITY THAT PROVIDES MONTHLY CHILD CARE
ALLOWANCES TO FIRST RESPONDERS TO ACCESS QUALITY CHILD CARE THAT
ALIGNS WITH THE DEMANDS OF A CAREER IN PUBLIC SAFETY.
(3) THE OFFICE SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM IN
CONSULTATION WITH:
(I) THE BALTIMORE POLICE DEPARTMENT;
(II) THE BALTIMORE CITY FIRE DEPARTMENT, INCLUDING
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES PERSONNEL; AND
(III) ANY NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION PARTNERS.
(C) (1) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION
OF $600,000 TO THE PROGRAM.
(2) THE FUNDS SHALL BE USED TO PROVIDE CHILD CARE
ALLOWANCES TO FIRST RESPONDERS IN BALTIMORE CITY TO:
(I) SUPPORT DEPENDENT CHILDREN IN EARLY CHILDHOOD
DEVELOPMENT;
(II) RECRUIT AND RETAIN FIRST RESPONDERS; AND
(III) PROMOTE PUBLIC SAFETY.
(D) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2028, AND EACH SEPTEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE OFFICE SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY ON THE PROGRAM, ON:
(1) THE NUMBER OF FIRST RESPONDERS WHO RECEIVED A CHILD
CARE ALLOWANCE UNDER THE PROGRAM DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
FISCAL YEAR DISAGGREGATED BY LOCAL PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCY THAT PROVIDES
EMERGENCY RESPONSE SERVICES;

HOUSE BILL 1245 3
(2) THE NUMBER OF CHILDREN SERVED DURING THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR;
(3) IMPACTS ON FIRST RESPONDER RECRUITMENT AND RETENTION
AND PUBLIC SAFETY, INCLUDING ATTENDANCE, RELIABILITY, AND WELLNESS; AND
(4) ANY OTHER RELEVANT INFORMATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.